test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_nik_gt-norm.yaml
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Obv: onikensishiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pl: onikensishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: ninikenyishibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: ninikenyishibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: ninikenyishibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: ninikensishibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: ninikensishibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: ninikensishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: ginikenyishibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: ginikenyishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: ginikenyishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: ginikensishibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: ginikensishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: ginikensishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: onikenyishibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: onikenyishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: onikenyishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: onikensishibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: onikensishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: onikensishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: inikenyishibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: inikenyishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: inikenyishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: inikensishibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: inikensishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: inikensishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikenyinaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikenyinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikenyinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikenyinaanidig, ninikenyinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikenyinaanidig, ninikenyinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikenyinaanidig, ninikenyinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikensinaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikensinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikensinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikensinaanidig, ninikensinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikensinaanidig, ninikensinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikensinaanidig, ninikensinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+21+Pret+Loc: ginikenyinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Con+21+Pret+Obv: ginikenyinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+21+Pret+Pl: ginikenyinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikenyinaanidig, ginikenyinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikenyinaanidig, ginikenyinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikenyinaanidig, ginikenyinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikenyiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikenyiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikenyiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikenyiwaadig, ginikenyiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikenyiwaadig, ginikenyiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikenyiwaadig, ginikenyiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21+Pret+Loc: ginikensinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21+Pret+Obv: ginikensinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21+Pret+Pl: ginikensinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikensinaanidig, ginikensinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikensinaanidig, ginikensinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikensinaanidig, ginikensinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikensiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikensiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikensiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikensiwaadig, ginikensiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikensiwaadig, ginikensiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikensiwaadig, ginikensiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikenyiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikenyiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikenyiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikenyiniidig, onikenyiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikenyiniidig, onikenyiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikenyiniidig, onikenyiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikenyiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikenyiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikenyiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikenyiwaadig, onikenyiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikenyiwaadig, onikenyiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikenyiwaadig, onikenyiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikensiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikensiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikensiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikensiniidig, onikensiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikensiniidig, onikensiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikensiniidig, onikensiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikensiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikensiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikensiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikensiwaadig, onikensiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikensiwaadig, onikensiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikensiwaadig, onikensiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: ninikimishinaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikimishinaanidig, ninikimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: ginikimishinaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [ginikimishinaanidig, ginikimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: ginikimishiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikimishiwaadig, ginikimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: onikimishiniiban
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [onikimishiniidig, onikimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: onikimishiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [onikimishiwaadig, onikimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: ninikimishinaaning
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: ninikimishinaanin
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: ninikimishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: ginikimishinaaning
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: ginikimishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: ginikimishinaanin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: ginikimishiwaang
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: ginikimishiwaan
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: ginikimishiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: onikimishiniing
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: onikimishiniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: onikimishiniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: onikimishiwaang
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: onikimishiwaan
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: onikimishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ninikimishibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ninikimishibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ninikimishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ginikimishibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ginikimishibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ginikimishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: onikimishibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: onikimishibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: onikimishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: inikimishibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: inikimishibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: inikimishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikiminaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikiminaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikiminaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikiminaanidig, ninikiminaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikiminaanidig, ninikiminaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikiminaanidig, ninikiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: ginikiminaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: ginikiminaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: ginikiminaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikiminaanidig, ginikiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikiminaanidig, ginikiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikiminaanidig, ginikiminaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikimiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikimiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikimiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikimiwaadig, ginikimiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikimiwaadig, ginikimiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikimiwaadig, ginikimiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikiminiibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikiminiibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikiminiibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikiminiidig, onikiminiidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikiminiidig, onikiminiidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikiminiidig, onikiminiidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikimiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikimiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikimiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikimiwaadig, onikimiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikimiwaadig, onikimiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikimiwaadig, onikimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikishinaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikishinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikishinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikishinaanidig, ninikishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikishinaanidig, ninikishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikishinaanidig, ninikishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: ginikishinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: ginikishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: ginikishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikishinaanidig, ginikishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikishinaanidig, ginikishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikishinaanidig, ginikishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikishiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikishiwaadig, ginikishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikishiwaadig, ginikishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikishiwaadig, ginikishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikishiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikishiniidig, onikishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikishiniidig, onikishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikishiniidig, onikishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikishiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikishiwaadig, onikishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikishiwaadig, onikishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikishiwaadig, onikishiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: ninikenyimishinaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikenyimishinaanidig, ninikenyimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: ninikensimishinaaniban
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikensimishinaanidig, ninikensimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: ginikenyimishinaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [ginikenyimishinaanidig, ginikenyimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: ginikenyimishiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikenyimishiwaadig, ginikenyimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: ginikensimishinaaniban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [ginikensimishinaanidig, ginikensimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: ginikensimishiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikensimishiwaadig, ginikensimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: onikenyimishiniiban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [onikenyimishiniidig, onikenyimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: onikenyimishiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [onikenyimishiwaadig, onikenyimishiwaadog]
